North Carolina statutes. Chapter 10B. Notaries.
Part 7. Changes in Status.

§ 10B-50.
Change of address.

Within 45 days after the change of a notary’s residence, business, or any mailing address or telephone number, the notary shall send to the Secretary by fax, e-mail, or certified mail, return receipt requested, a signed notice of the change, giving both old and new addresses or telephone numbers.

History.

1991, c. 683, s. 2; 1995, c. 226, s. 3; 2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-51.
Change of name.

Within 45 days after the legal change of a notary’s name, the notary shall send to the Secretary by fax, e-mail, or certified mail, return receipt requested, a signed notice of the change. The notice shall include both the notary’s former name and the notary’s new name.

A notary with a new name may continue to use the former name in performing notarial acts until all of the following steps have been completed:

The notary receives a confirmation of Notary’s Name Change from the Secretary.

The notary obtains a new seal bearing the new name exactly as that name appears in the confirmation from the Secretary.

The notary appears before the register of deeds to which the commission was delivered within 45 days of the effective date of the change to be duly qualified by taking the general oath of office prescribed in

G.S. 11-11

and the oath prescribed for officers in

G.S. 11-7

under the new name and to have the notary public record changed to reflect the new commissioned name.

Upon completion of the requirements in subsection (b) of this section, the notary shall use the new name.

History.

1991, c. 683, s. 2; 1995, c. 226, s. 3; 2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-52.
Change of county.

A notary who has moved to another county in North Carolina remains commissioned until the current commission expires, is not required to obtain a new seal, and may continue to notarize without changing his or her seal.

When a notary who has moved applies to be recommissioned, if the commission is granted the, Secretary shall issue a notice of recommissioning. The commission applicant shall then do all of the following:

Obtain a new seal bearing the new county exactly as in the notice of recommissioning.

Appear before the register of deeds to which the commission was delivered within 45 days of recommissioning, to be duly qualified by taking the general oath of office prescribed in

G.S. 11-11

and the oath prescribed for officers in

G.S. 11-7

under the new county and to have the notary public record changed to reflect the new county name.

History.

1991, c. 683, s. 2; 1995, c. 226; s. 3; 2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-53.
Change of both name and county.

Within 45 days after the legal change of a notary’s name, and if the notary has also moved to a different county than as last commissioned, the notary shall submit to the Secretary a recommissioning application and fee pursuant to this Chapter. The notary may continue to perform notarial acts under the notary’s previous name and seal until all of the following steps have been completed:

The notary receives a transmittal receipt of reappointment due to name and county change from the Secretary.

The notary obtains a new seal bearing the new name and county exactly as those items appear in the transmittal receipt.

The notary appears before the register of deeds to which the commission was delivered within 45 days of recommissioning to be duly qualified by taking the general oath of office prescribed in

G.S. 11-11

and the oath prescribed for officers in

G.S. 11-7

under the new name and county and to have the notary public record changed to reflect the new name and county.

History.

1991, c. 683, s. 2; 1995, c. 226, s. 3; 2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-54.
Resignation.

A notary who resigns the notary’s commission shall send to the Secretary by fax, e-mail, or certified mail, return receipt requested, a signed notice indicating the effective date of resignation.

Notaries who cease to reside in or to maintain a regular place of work or business in this State, or who become permanently unable to perform their notarial duties, shall resign their commissions and shall deliver their seals to the Secretary by certified mail, return receipt requested.

History.

2005-391, s. 4.

§ 10B-55.
Disposition of seal; death of notary.

When a notary commission is resigned or revoked, the notary shall deliver the notary’s seal to the Secretary within 45 days of the resignation or revocation. Delivery shall be accomplished by certified mail, return receipt requested. The Secretary shall destroy any seal received under this subsection.

A notary whose commission has expired and whose previous commission or application was not revoked or denied by this State, is not required to deliver the seal to the Secretary as provided under subsection (a) of this section if the notary intends to apply to be recommissioned and is recommissioned within three months after the notary’s commission expires.

If a notary dies while commissioned or before fulfilling the disposition of seal requirements in this section, the notary’s estate shall, as soon as is reasonably practicable and no later than the closing of the estate, notify the Secretary in writing of the notary’s death and deliver the notary’s seal to the Secretary for destruction. A personal representative who is not a notary does not have to comply with the provisions of this subsection if he or she provides a statement under oath in any enforcement proceeding that he or she was unaware that the decedent was a commissioned notary public at the time of death.

History.

2005-391, s. 4; 2013-204, s. 1.3.

§§ 10B-56 through 10B-59.

Reserved for future codification purposes.